Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Historical Districts.

Sec. 29.55.010.
Creation of local historical district commissions.

The governing body of a municipality may establish a local historical district commission or designate the planning commission or itself to serve as the historical district commission.

History.

(§ 15 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.55.020.
Establishment of historical districts.

In addition to existing municipal authority providing for the preservation, protection, and maintenance of historic sites, the local historical district commission, in consultation with the Alaska Historical Commission in the Department of Natural Resources, may establish historical districts within the boundaries of the municipality.

A historical district shall be a reasonably compact area of historical significance in which two or more structures important in state or national history, and related by physical proximity or historical association, are located. For purposes of this subsection, “structures important in state or national history” means properties recommended by historical district commissions that are listed in the National Register of Historic Places or are characteristic of the Russian-American period before October 18, 1867, the early territorial period before 1930, or early Native heritage, reflecting the indigenous characteristics of Native culture in Alaska. On recommendation of the governing body of a municipality and the Alaska Historical Commission, the Department of Natural Resources may by regulation formulate additional criteria for the establishment of historical districts not inconsistent with this subsection.

The establishment of a historical district under this section shall be consistent with any applicable comprehensive plan for the municipality.

History.

(§ 15 ch 74 SLA 1985; am E.O. No. 83 §§ 2, 3 (1993))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in subsection (b), “subsection” was substituted for “section” to correct a manifest error in ch. 74, SLA 1985.